Washington, session 2025-2026, HB1020.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:Sec. 1. RCW 28A.175.100 and 2010 c 20 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:(1) This section and RCW 28A.175.105 through 28A.175.115 provide a statutory framework for a statewide dropout reengagement system to provide appropriate educational opportunities and access to services for eligible students ((age sixteen to twenty-one who have dropped out of high school or are not accumulating sufficient credits to reasonably complete a high school diploma in a public school before the age of twenty-one))as defined in RCW 28A.175.105.(2) Under the system, school districts may:(a) Enter into the model interlocal agreement developed under RCW 28A.175.110 with an educational service district, community or technical college, or other public entity to provide a dropout reengagement program for eligible students of the district; or(b) Enter into the model contract developed under RCW 28A.175.110 with a community-based organization to provide a dropout reengagement program for eligible students of the district.(3) If a school district does not enter an interlocal agreement or contract with an educational service district, community or technical college, other public entity, or community-based organization to provide a dropout reengagement program for eligible students residing in the district, the educational service district, community or technical college, other public entity, or community-based organization may petition a school district other than the resident school district to enroll the eligible students under RCW 28A.225.220 through 28A.225.230 and enter the interlocal agreement or contract with the petitioning entity to provide a dropout reengagement program for the eligible students.(4) This section does not affect the authority of school districts to contract for educational services under RCW 28A.150.305 and 28A.320.035. This section also does not affect the authority of school districts to offer dropout reengagement programs or other educational services for eligible students directly.Sec. 2. RCW 28A.175.105 and 2021 c 164 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:The definitions in this section apply throughout RCW 28A.175.100 through 28A.175.110 unless the context clearly requires otherwise:(1) "Dropout reengagement program" means an educational program that offers at least the following instruction and services:(a) Academic instruction, including but not limited to preparation to earn a high school equivalency certificate as provided in RCW 28B.50.536 in accordance with rules adopted under RCW 28A.305.190, academic skills instruction, and college and work readiness preparation, that generates credits that can be applied to a high school diploma from the student's school district or from a community or technical college under RCW 28B.50.535 and has the goal of enabling the student to obtain the academic and work readiness skills necessary for employment or postsecondary study. A dropout reengagement program is not required to offer instruction in only those subject areas where a student is deficient in accumulated credits. Academic instruction must be provided by teachers certified by the Washington professional educator standards board or by instructors employed by a community or technical college whose required credentials are established by the college;(b) Case management, academic and career counseling, and assistance with accessing services and resources that support at-risk youth and reduce barriers to educational success; and(c) If the program provider is a community or technical college, the opportunity for qualified students to enroll in college courses that lead to a postsecondary degree or certificate. The college may not charge an eligible student tuition for such enrollment.(2) "Eligible student" means a student who:(a) Is ((at least sixteen but))eligible to be enrolled in high school and is less than ((twenty-one))21 years of age at the beginning of the school year;(b) Is not accumulating sufficient credits toward a high school diploma to reasonably complete a high school diploma from a public school before the age of ((twenty-one))21, or is recommended for the program by case managers from the department of social and health services or the juvenile justice system; and(c) Is enrolled or enrolls in the school district in which the student resides, or is enrolled or enrolls in an institutional education program as defined in RCW 28A.190.005 or a nonresident school district under RCW 28A.225.220 through 28A.225.230.(3) "Full-time equivalent eligible student" means an eligible student whose enrollment and attendance meet criteria adopted by the office of the superintendent of public instruction specifically for dropout reengagement programs. The criteria shall be:(a) Based on the community or technical college credits generated by the student if the program provider is a community or technical college; and(b) Based on a minimum amount of planned programming or instruction and minimum attendance by the student rather than hours of seat time if the program provider is a community-based organization.Sec. 3. RCW 28A.175.115 and 2010 c 20 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:(1) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall adopt and amend as necessary rules to implement RCW 28A.175.100 through 28A.175.110.(2) When adopting rules under this section and developing model interlocal agreements and contracts under RCW 28A.175.110, the office of the superintendent of public instruction shall consult with the state board for community and technical colleges, the workforce training and education coordinating board, colleges and community-based organizations that have previously offered dropout reengagement programs, providers of online courses and programs approved under RCW 28A.250.020, school districts, and educational service districts.--- END ---